District of Columbia statutes.
47-2888.03

Veterinary facility license, fees.

(a)

The application for a veterinary facility license shall be made on a form to be prescribed by the Mayor and shall be accompanied by the required fee. Each application shall list each certificate of approval, authority, occupancy, and any other prerequisite required as a precondition for operation of a veterinary facility.

(b)

A license shall be valid for a period of one year and shall be limited to the premises or the vehicle stated on the license. A license may be renewed for additional one-year periods upon payment of the appropriate fee.

(c)

A license issued under this section shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the premises. A mobile facility license shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the vehicle.

(d)

The Mayor may issue a license that clearly specifies the scope of the facility’s operation. The specifications shall not confer or denote an area of specialty by the veterinary facility or by the holder of the license. The Mayor shall determine the terms and restrictions that apply to the specifications by rulemaking.

(e)

The initial fees shall be as follows:

(1)

Original veterinary facility license, $195; and

(2)

Renewal of veterinary facility license, $170.

(f)

The Mayor may periodically adjust the fees by publishing notice in the District of Columbia Register 30 days before changing the fees.

March 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 302(b), 61 DCR 1184